Arkansas, session 2025, SB507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Applied behavior analysis services.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall cover applied behavior
analysis services for beneficiaries who:
(1) Are over twenty-one (21) years of age;
(2) Have a diagnosis of autism;
(3) Are participants in the Community and Employment Services
Waiver; and
(4) Have received a determination from a primary care physician,
attending psychologist, or psychiatrist that applied behavior analysis
services are medically necessary.
(b) The applied behavior analysis services shall be delivered:
(1) Based on the needs of the beneficiary, including applied
behavior analysis services on a one-to-one basis at home and in the
community; and
*JMB482*
03/18/2025 3:18:38 PM JMB482

SB507
(2) By a board certified behavior analyst or a registered
behavior technician who is under the supervision of a board certified
behavior analyst.
(c) The applied behavior analysis services shall not be limited or
restricted to group and clinical settings.
(d) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment, or other authorization necessary to
implement this section.




























03/18/2025 3:18:38 PM JMB482